Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 2. County Seats

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 44 to 49.

Withdrawal of name from petition for change of county seat, or revocation of withdrawal, and time therefor, 27 ALR2d 604.

20 C.J.S. Counties §§ 53 to 73.

§ 18-1-201.
County seats enumerated.

The county seats in the state of Wyoming are as follows:

Albany county, at Laramie;

Big Horn county, at Basin;

Campbell county, at Gillette;

Carbon county, at Rawlins;

Converse county, at Douglas;

Crook county, at Sundance;

Fremont county, at Lander;

Goshen county, at Torrington;

Hot Springs county, at Thermopolis;

Johnson county, at Buffalo;

Laramie county, at Cheyenne;

Lincoln county, at Kemmerer;

Natrona county, at Casper;

Niobrara county, at Lusk;

Park county, at Cody;

Platte county, at Wheatland;

Sheridan county, at Sheridan;

Sublette county, at Pinedale;

Sweetwater county, at Green River;

Teton county, at Jackson;

Uinta county, at Evanston;

Washakie county, at Worland;

Weston county, at Newcastle.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 27, §§ 2, 3; ch. 107, § 1; Laws 1884, ch. 46, § 1; R.S. 1887, §§ 658, 660, 663, 666, 668; 1899, § 980; C.S. 1910, § 1022; C.S. 1920, § 1248; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 14; R.S. 1931, § 29-101; C.S. 1945, § 26-101; W.S. 1957, § 18-1; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to changing county seats, see art. 12, § 3, Wyo. Const.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.